Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.110

Reporter's duties.

He or she shall prepare such decisions for publication by giving the title of each case, a syllabus of the points decided, a brief statement of the facts bearing on the points decided, the names of the counsel, and a reference to such authorities as are cited from standard reports and textbooks that have a special bearing on the case, and he or she shall prepare a full and comprehensive index to each volume, and prefix a table of cases reported.

[ 2011 c 336 s 47; 1890 p 320 s 2; RRS s 11059.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 17.